South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4617.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 31, Title 34 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 34-31-30.  A merchant located in this State that is unable to make exact change for a customer must round up or down to the nearest nickel. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----